Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXIV Public Utilities
Telephone and Telegraph Companies

278.510.
Consolidation of telephone lines. [Repealed]

History.

4679e-1, 4679e-2, 4679e-4: amend. Acts 1978, ch. 379, § 52, effective April 1, 1979; 1982, ch. 82, § 48, effective July 15, 1982; repealed by 2019 ch. 66, § 3, effective June 27, 2019.

278.512.
Legislative findings — Exemption of telecommunications product or service from regulation.

The legislature finds and determines that:

Competition and innovation have become commonplace in the provision of certain telecommunications services in Kentucky and the United States;

Flexibility in the regulation of the rates of providers of telecommunications service is essential to the well-being of this state, its economy, and its citizens; and

The public interest requires that the Public Service Commission be authorized and encouraged to formulate and adopt rules and policies that will permit the commission, in the exercise of its expertise, to regulate and control the provision of telecommunications services to the public in a changing environment, giving due regard to the interests of consumers, the public, the providers of the telecommunications services, and the continued availability of good telecommunications service.

Notwithstanding any other statute to the contrary, the commission may, on its own motion or upon motion of a telecommunications utility, after notice and opportunity for comment, and hearing if requested, exempt to the extent it deems reasonable, services or products related to telecommunications utilities or persons who provide telecommunications services or products from any or all of the provisions of this chapter, or may adopt alternative requirements for establishing rates and charges for any service by a method other than that which is specified in this chapter, if the commission finds by clear and satisfactory evidence that it is in the public interest. No exemption shall be granted under this statute which preempts, without notice and without hearing, if requested, the existing rights and obligations of a local exchange company to serve a territory under a tariff approved by the Public Service Commission. Any party which seeks an exemption shall certify to the commission at the time of the filing that he has notified the affected local exchange company by registered mail of the filing of a petition for exemption, and of the right of the local exchange company to request a hearing within thirty (30) days of the notification.

In determining public interest, the commission shall consider the following:

The extent to which competing telecommunications services are available from competitive providers in the relevant market;

The existing ability and willingness of competitive providers to make functionally equivalent or substitute services readily available;

The number and size of competitive providers of service;

The overall impact of the proposed regulatory change on the continued availability of existing services at just and reasonable rates;

The existence of adequate safeguards to assure that rates for services regulated pursuant to this chapter do not subsidize exempted services;

The impact of the proposed regulatory change upon efforts to promote universal availability of basic telecommunications services at affordable rates and upon the need of telecommunications companies subject to the jurisdiction of the commission to respond to competition;

Whether the exercise of commission jurisdiction inhibits a regulated utility from competing with unregulated providers of functionally similar telecommunications services or products;

The overall impact on customers of a proposed change to streamline regulatory treatment of small or nonprofit carriers; and

Any other factors the commission may determine are in the public interest.

When the commission exempts a telecommunications product or service from all of the provisions of this chapter, the investment, revenues, and expenses associated with the service or product shall not be considered by the commission in setting rates for the telecommunications company’s regulated services. This provision shall only apply to telecommunication products or services which the commission exempts after July 14, 1992. Nothing herein shall prohibit the commission from having access to and from examining the books and records of the exempted product or service in order to determine compliance with the commission’s rules respecting allocation of cost when setting rates for the telecommunications company’s regulated services.

The Public Service Commission shall retain jurisdiction over persons and services which are exempted from regulation under this section, or for which alternative regulatory requirements have been established pursuant to this section. The commission, on its own motion, or upon the motion of any person, after notice and hearing, if requested, may vacate or modify any orders granting an exemption or establishing alternative requirements if it determines by clear and satisfactory evidence that the findings upon which the order was based are no longer valid, or that the exemption or modifications are no longer in the public interest.

In granting or vacating exemptions, the Public Service Commission shall not be discriminatory or preferential but may treat services and utilities differently if reasonable and not detrimental to the public interest.

The provisions of KRS 367.150(8) and

367.160

, concerning the role of the Attorney General, shall apply to all proceedings under this section.

History.

Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 306, § 1, effective July 14, 1992.

278.514.
Exempted service not to be subsidized by nonexempted, regulated telecommunications services.

Revenues derived from nonexempted, regulated telecommunications services, whether essential or nonessential, shall not be used to subsidize or otherwise give advantage to any person providing an exempted service. The commission shall require a provider of any exempted service to keep separate accounts, to allocate cost in accordance with procedures established by the commission, and may require other acts that will assist the commission in enforcing this section. Any person requesting an exemption or providing a service exempted pursuant to KRS

278.512

shall have the burden of proof to show compliance with this requirement.

Except as provided in subsection (2)(b) of this section, any telecommunications utility that willfully violates subsection (1) of this section shall be subject to a penalty no greater than the revenue requirement effect of moneys determined to have been misallocated in the violation. For the purpose of calculating the penalty under this section, the commission shall not use a period longer than five (5) years.

A local exchange carrier with fewer than thirty-five thousand (35,000) access lines who willfully violates subsection (1) of this section shall be subject to the penalties prescribed in KRS 278.990(1).

History.

Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 306, § 2, effective July 14, 1992.

278.516.
Alternative regulation process for small telephone utilities — Findings — Definitions — Procedures — Withdrawal.

The legislature finds and determines that:

Small telephone utilities lack the resources to fully participate in the existing regulatory processes, particularly under traditional rate of return and certificate of public convenience and necessity regulation;

Regulation, if not tailored specifically to the needs of small telephone utilities, can retard the growth and development of small telephone utilities by requiring the expenditure of excessive time and money responding to and addressing regulatory processes instead of devoting those resources to customer service and more productive business concerns and issues; and

It is in the public interest to provide regulatory flexibility to small telephone utilities to better enable them to adjust to the competition and innovation that has come and is coming to the telecommunications industry as found and determined by the legislature at KRS 278.512(1).

In addition to the definitions set forth at KRS

278.010

, the following definitions shall apply to this section:

“Telephone utility” means a telephone utility as defined at KRS

278.010

(3)(e) except that it includes local exchange carriers only;

“Local exchange carrier” means a traditional wireline telephone utility which provides its subscribers with access to the national public switched telephone network;

“Traditional wireline telephone utility” means one whose delivery of its telephone utility services is characterized by the predominant use of wire or wireline connections carrying communications transmissions between the subscriber of the utility and the national public switched telephone network;

“Small telephone utility” means a local exchange carrier providing telephone utility service and having not more than fifty thousand (50,000) access lines in Kentucky;

“Largest telephone utility” means the local exchange carrier providing telephone utility service in Kentucky and having the greatest number of access lines in Kentucky;

“Access lines” mean the telephone lines provided by a local exchange carrier. In calculating the number of access lines provided by a local exchange carrier, the number of access lines provided by all telephone utilities under common ownership or control, as defined in KRS 278.020(7), with that telephone utility shall be counted;

“GDP” means the real Gross Domestic Product Price Index, as it may be amended from time to time, as it is published by the Bureau of Economic Analysis of the United States Department of Commerce;

“Annual percent change in the GDP” means, for any given calendar year, the annul percentage change in the GDP as it is calculated by the Bureau of Economic Analysis of the United States Department of Commerce;

“Basic business rate” and “basic residential rate” mean the total rates or charges which must be paid by a business or residential subscriber, respectively, to a local exchange carrier in order to receive, outside of a standard metropolitan statistical area, telephone utility service within a specified geographic area for local calling and for which tariffed rates or charges are assessed, regardless of the amount of use of local calling;

“Standard metropolitan statistical area” means any area in Kentucky designated as such, or as a part thereof, pursuant to 44

U.S.C. sec. 3504(d)(3)

and 31

U.S.C. sec. 1104(d)

, as they may be amended, by the Office of Management and Budget of the Executive Office of the President of the United States; provided, however, that for purposes of this section, “standard metropolitan statistical area” shall include only the two (2) largest, as measured by population, standard metropolitan statistical areas, regardless of whether that area is located wholly or partially in Kentucky;

“Basic business service” or “basic residential service” means the service for which basic business rates or basic residential rates are charged;

“Average basic business or residential rate, including zone charges,” means the total revenues which should be produced by the imposition of those rates or charges divided by the number of access lines to which those rates or charges are applicable;

“Zone charges” mean mileage or zone charges and are the charges assessed by a telephone utility on the basis of a subscriber’s distance from a central office in order that the subscriber may receive basic business or residential services;

“Subscriber” means the person or entity legally and financially responsible for the bill rendered by a telephone utility for its services;

“Intrastate access charges” mean the charges assessed for use of the telecommunications facilities of one telephone utility by another person or entity in order to deliver to the public for compensation telephone messages originating and terminating within Kentucky;

“Interstate access charges” mean the charges assessed for use of the telecommunications facilities of one (1) telephone utility by another person or entity in order to deliver to the public for compensation telephone messages originating or terminating, but not both, in Kentucky; and

“Pic charges” are charges assessed by a local exchange carrier in order to implement a change in a subscriber’s long distance carrier.

If a small telephone utility elects to be regulated as provided in subsection (7) of this section, a small telephone utility once during any twenty-four (24) month period may adjust or implement each of the following rates or charges: basic business rate; basic residential rate; zone charges; or installation charges for basic business or basic residential services by an amount not to exceed the sum of the annual percentage changes in the GDP for the immediately preceding two (2) calendar years multiplied by the existing rate or charge to be adjusted. However, in no event shall a small telephone utility so adjust:

Its basic business rate, including zone charges, if the resulting average basic business rate, including zone charges, would thereby exceed the average basic business rate, including zone charges, of the largest telephone utility;

Its basic residential rate, including zone charges, if the resulting average basic residential rate would thereby exceed the average basic residential rate including zone charges, of the largest telephone utility; or

If its average basic business rate, including zone charges, its average basic residential rate, including zone charges, or its installation charges for basic business or basic residential services would be increased by more than twenty percent (20%).

At least sixty (60) calendar days before the effective date of such an adjustment of its rates or charges, a small telephone utility shall file a copy of its revised rates and tariffs with the commission and shall mail notice of the proposed rate adjustment to each affected subscriber and the commission. The notice shall state:

The GDP for the preceding two (2) calendar years;

The amount by which any of the small telephone utility’s rates or charges identified in subsection (3)(a) of this section will be adjusted; and

The right of subscribers to object to the adjustment and request commission review by filing a letter or petition with the commission.

If by the forty-fifth calendar day following the date of the notice to subscribers of such a proposed adjustment to its rates or charges, the commission has received letters or petitions requesting commission review of the adjustment signed by at least five hundred (500) subscribers or five percent (5%) of subscribers, whichever is greater, the commission shall immediately notify the small telephone utility of this fact, and the proposed rate adjustment shall not become effective as scheduled. The small telephone utility may withdraw the proposed rate or charge adjustment, or if it decides to proceed, the commission shall review the proposed rate adjustment as though no election had been made pursuant to subsection (7) of this section.

Any other provision of this chapter notwithstanding, a small telephone utility which has elected to be regulated pursuant to this section may adjust any of its rates, charges, or tariffs, except for:

Its basic business rate;

Its basic residential rate;

Its zone charges;

Its installation charges for basic business or basic residential services;

Its access charges; or

Its pic charges,

without regard to the effect on its revenues, by filing its proposed rates, charges, or tariffs with the commission and by notifying its subscribers, both at least thirty (30) calendar days prior to the effective date of its proposed rates, charges, or tariffs.

A small telephone utility which has elected to be regulated pursuant to this section shall not:

Adjust its intrastate access charges if the adjustment requires the small telephone utility’s access charge customers, including interexchange carriers, to pay intrastate access charges at levels exceeding the small telephone utility’s interstate access charge levels; or

Adjust its intrastate pic charges if the adjustment requires the small telephone utility’s customers to pay intrastate pic charges at levels exceeding the small telephone utility’s interstate pic charge levels.

The small telephone utility may decrease its intrastate access charges or intrastate pic charges to any level without restriction. Adjustments to intrastate access charge rates or intrastate pic charges shall be effective thirty (30) calendar days following the filing of access charge tariffs or pic charge tariffs with the commission.

The rates, charges, earnings, or revenues of a small telephone utility which has elected to be regulated pursuant to this section and is in compliance with the provisions of this section shall be deemed by the commission to be in compliance with KRS 278.030(1).

A small telephone utility may elect, at any time, to be regulated by the provisions, in their entirety only, of this section by filing a verified resolution of the utility’s board of directors, or other governing body, so electing with the commission. An election shall be effective immediately upon filing with the commission and shall remain effective until withdrawn by the filing with the commission of a verified resolution of the small telephone utility’s board of directors or other governing body; provided, however, that all resolutions of election or withdrawal shall remain in effect for at least one (1) year from the date of their filing with the commission. A resolution electing to be regulated by the provisions of this section shall mean that the small telephone utility so electing shall be regulated by this section and shall not be regulated by KRS 278.020(1) and

278.300

. Nothing in this section, however, shall be construed to alter the applicability of KRS 278.020(5) or 278.030(2) to small telephone utilities electing to be regulated by the provisions of this section.

A small telephone utility which has elected to be regulated pursuant to this section may file an application with the commission pursuant to KRS 278.020(1), and, if a utility does so, that application shall be deemed to have been granted unless within thirty (30) calendar days following the filing of the application, the commission denies the application. If the application is denied or none is filed, the small telephone utility electing to be regulated pursuant to this section may engage in the construction of the plant or facilities, or the purchase of equipment or properties, to provide the services described in KRS 278.010(3)(e). However, if the small telephone utility subsequently files a resolution of withdrawal under subsection (7) of this section, the increased value of property that resulted from any construction project denied approval by the commission or not submitted to the commission for approval may be excluded from the small utility’s rate base for rate making purposes if the cost of construction exceeded one million dollars ($1,000,000) or five percent (5%) of the value of the small telephone utility’s property as reflected in the utility’s most recent annual report filed with the commission.

History.

Enact. Acts 1996, ch. 71, § 1, effective July 15, 1996; 2004, ch. 75, § 2, effective July 13, 2004; 2016 ch. 50, § 3, effective April 8, 2016.

278.520.
Transmission of long distance messages from other telephone lines.

Telephone companies operating exchanges in different cities shall receive and transmit each other’s messages without unreasonable delay or discrimination. The telephone exchange receiving any message from the exchange in which the message originated, and each other connecting exchange through which the message must be routed in order to reach its destination, shall switch the message through its exchange without unreasonable delay or discrimination and with the same promptness with which messages originating and ending on its own lines are handled, by causing the talking circuit to be connected over the toll line leading through or from the receiving exchange through any other connecting exchanges to the point of destination. It is the intention of this section to compel the connecting up and usage of toll wires through the various intervening exchanges between the exchange in which the messages originate and the point of destination, so that the party requesting service may be able to hold a conversation with the party called for at the point of destination.

History.

4679F-1.

278.530.
Procedure to compel connection with telephone exchange or line.

Whenever any telephone company desires to connect its exchange or lines with the exchange or lines of another telephone company and the latter refuses to permit this to be done upon reasonable terms, rates and conditions, the company desiring the connection may proceed as provided in subsection (2) or as provided in subsection (3) of this section.

The company desiring the connection may file a written statement with the Public Service Commission setting out the reasons why the connection is desired and the points at which the connection should be made, and giving the name and address of the owner or chief officer residing in this state of each company with which the connection is desired. The executive director of the commission shall thereupon cause a copy of the written statement to be served upon the companies owning or operating such lines or exchanges, by mailing a copy to the owner or chief officer residing in this state, and shall fix a date, not earlier than ten (10) days from the date of mailing the notice, for the hearing of the application. Upon the day so fixed for the hearing, the companies may respond in writing to the application, and either side may introduce such testimony as it desires and be heard by attorneys. After the hearing is completed the commission shall make its finding and enter it in a book to be kept for that purpose, and shall mail a copy thereof to each side; and if the commission directs the connection to be made it shall indicate the points where the connection is to be made, the number of wires to be connected, the terms and conditions and the rates to be charged, and the division of the rates charged between the companies handling the messages. The cost of making the connection shall be borne equally by the parties. If any company refuses to make a connection for a period of thirty (30) days after the finding of the commission directing the connection to be made, the company desiring the connection may make the connection and may recover one-half (1/2) of the cost thereof from the company so refusing.

In lieu of the procedure provided in subsection (2) of this section, the company desiring the connection may compel the connection upon reasonable terms by suit in equity in the Franklin Circuit Court or in the Circuit Court of the county in which the company making the demand resides or has its chief office in this state, and the court shall, by mandatory injunction, compel the physical connection of the wires and interchange of messages, and enforce the same by contempt proceedings and in the same manner that other mandatory injunctions are enforced.

History.

4679f-2, 4679f-3: amend. Acts 1978, ch. 379, § 53, effective April 1, 1979; 1982, ch. 82, § 49, effective July 15, 1982; 1994, ch. 166, § 4, effective July 15, 1994.

278.535.
Switching of telecommunications provider — Penalty — Administrative regulations.

As used in this section:

“Telecommunications provider” or “provider” means a person that provides one (1) or more telecommunications services for compensation, and its successors in interest by way of acquisition or merger, and includes a provider of regulated and unregulated intrastate services offered to customers for the transmission of two-way, interactive communications. “Telecommunications provider” or “provider” does not include a provider of commercial mobile radio services as defined in 47

U.S.C. sec. 332(d)(1)

.

“Letter of agency” means a written statement that authorizes a change of the customer’s telecommunications provider and bears the customer’s signature.

A customer of a telecommunications provider shall not be switched to another provider without the customer’s letter of agency or the electronically recorded authorization of the customer, indicating that the customer knowingly approved the specific details of the switch. The requirement of a written or electronically recorded authorization shall not apply if the customer initiates a call to the customer’s local telephone service provider to request that his long-distance provider be changed. When a customer’s service is changed, the new provider shall maintain for one (1) year a record of nonpublic customer-specific information that establishes that the customer authorized the change. In any dispute, the burden of proof to show that the customer knowingly authorized the change shall be on the provider that claims to have obtained customer authorization for the switch.

If a letter of agency is combined with an inducement, or with information on a subject other than the change of a customer’s telecommunications provider, whether or not the letter of agency can be easily severed from the rest of the document, then the language whereby a person authorizes service from the provider shall be printed in a type size as large or larger than the largest type used in the document that includes the letter of agency.

If a telecommunications provider initiates a switch of provider that the customer has not authorized under this section, that provider, upon request by the customer, shall reverse the change within five (5) business days.

The customer subjected to a change that is not verified consistent with this section or administrative regulations promulgated under this section is not responsible for any charges associated with the unauthorized change, including charges for usage subsequent to the change that are in excess of the amount the customer would have paid had the service not been changed, if the customer contacts the customer’s local exchange carrier, the customer’s previous provider of intrastate service, or the telecommunications provider that initiated an unauthorized change in service within one hundred eighty (180) days after receipt of the customer’s first bill containing charges by the telecommunications provider that initiated the unauthorized change. A telecommunications provider that has initiated an unauthorized customer change shall:

Pay all charges associated with returning the customer to the customer’s original telecommunications provider;

Return to the customer any amount paid to the provider by the customer or on the customer’s behalf in excess of the amount the customer would have paid had the service not been changed; and

Upon request, provide all billing records to the original provider from which the customer was changed to enable the original provider to comply with this section.

The telecommunications provider that initiated the unauthorized change is responsible for any payment to access providers or to an underlying carrier where applicable. Failure of the customer to provide timely notice will relieve the telecommunications provider that initiated the unauthorized change of any obligations under this subsection.

If the commission finds that a provider has willfully or repeatedly violated this section or an administrative regulation promulgated under it, the commission shall order the provider to take corrective action as necessary. The commission may impose a penalty on the violator as specified in KRS 278.990(1), except that the maximum civil penalty to be assessed for each violation of this section shall be ten thousand dollars ($10,000). The commission also may, if consistent with the public interest, suspend, restrict, or revoke any certificate or registration of the telecommunications provider, thereby denying the provider the authorization to provide telecommunications service in the Commonwealth.

The commission shall promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A to implement the policies of this section.

History.

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 523, § 1, effective July 15, 1998.

278.540.
Acquisition of right-of-way by telephone or telegraph company — Condemnation.

Any telephone company or telegraph company authorized to do business in this state shall, upon making just compensation, have the right to construct, maintain and operate its lines through any public lands of this state and on, across and along any public road, and across and under any navigable waters, but not in such a manner as to interfere with travel on the road or to obstruct the navigation of the waters.

Any telephone company authorized to do business in this state may, by contract with any person, construct, maintain and operate telephone lines on and across the real property of that person, and if it cannot obtain the right-of-way by contract it may, except as provided in KRS

416.090

, condemn the right-of-way in the manner provided in the Eminent Domain Act of Kentucky.

Any telegraph company authorized to do business in this state that desires to construct, operate and maintain its lines on or along the right-of-way and structure of any railroad may, through an authorized agent, contract with the railroad company for that right.

The parts of this section relating to the rights of telephone companies do not apply to any city.

History.

4679c-1, 4679c-2, 4679d-1 to 4679d-3: amend. Acts 1976, ch. 140, § 113.